Maine, session 132, LD930.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §757, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1975, c. 499, §1, is amended
to read:
3. Trafficking Except as provided in subsection 4, trafficking in prison contraband is
a Class C crime.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §757, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. If the prison contraband under subsection 1, paragraph B is electronic contraband
that is not intended to be used to commit a separate crime, trafficking in prison contraband
is a Class D crime. For purposes of this subsection, "electronic contraband" means a mobile
telephone or other handheld electronic communication device not authorized or issued by
the custodial authority.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §757-A, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 386, §2, is amended to read:
§757-A. Trafficking of tobacco or vaping device in adult correctional facilities
1. A person is guilty of trafficking tobacco or a vaping device in an adult correctional
facility if:
A. That person intentionally conveys or attempts to convey tobacco or, tobacco
products or a vaping device to a person confined in an adult correctional facility that
has banned the use of tobacco or, tobacco products or vaping devices by prisoners; or
B. That person is confined in an adult correctional facility that has banned the use of
tobacco or, tobacco products or vaping devices by prisoners and the person
intentionally obtains or possesses tobacco or, tobacco products or a vaping device.
2. As used in this section, "adult correctional facility" means a county jail or
correctional facility other than a juvenile facility under the control of the Department of
Corrections and "vaping device" means a device, also known as a vape, e-cigarette,
electronic cigarette or electronic vaporizer, that simulates smoking using an atomizer, a
power source such as a battery and a container such as a cartridge or a tank and is used for
ingesting any substance, including a drug identified in section 1101, subsection 11.
Page 1 - 132LR1246(03)

3. Trafficking of tobacco or a vaping device in an adult correctional facility is a Class
E crime.
Page 2 - 132LR1246(03)